Utah statutes.
13-47-201.   Verification required for new hires.

(1)  A private employer who employs 15 or more employees as of July 1, 2010, may not hire a new employee on or after July 1, 2010, unless the private employer:

(a)  is registered with a status verification system to verify the federal legal working status of any new employee; and

(b)  uses the status verification system to verify the federal legal working status of the new employee in accordance with the requirements of the status verification system.

(2)  This section does not apply to a private employer of a foreign national if the foreign national holds a visa issued in response to a petition by the private employer that is classified as H-2A or H-2B.

